Wyoming statutes. Title 34 Property, Conveyances and Security Transactions
Chapter 2 Deeds, Mortgages and Leases Generally

Cross references. —

As to reconveyance of trust deeds and release of mortgages by title insurers and title agents, see §

34-1-145

et seq.

As to when lien of judgment attaches to property, see §

1-17-302

.

As to deed upon conveyance of real estate under enforcement of judgment lien by execution as prima facie evidence of legality and regularity of sale and as to effect thereof, see §

1-17-324

.

As to when judgment loses preference, and as to lien continuing for 1 year, see §

1-17-336

.

As to mortgage, lease or sale by fiduciaries, see §§

2-3-501

to

2-3-504

.

As to disposal of mortgaged property with intent to deprive mortgagee of security, see §

6-3-607

.

As to mortgages in connection with state loan and investment board loans generally, see §§

11-34-109

to

11-34-112

.

As to loans on real estate by banks, and limitations thereon, see §

13-3-401

.

As to power of railroads to mortgage or execute deeds of trust upon property and franchises, see §§

37-9-101

to

37-9-106

.

As to tax deeds in connection with real estate sold for taxes, see §§

39-13-108

,

39-13-109

.

As to deeds for reservoir waters, etc., see §

41-3-323

et seq.

As to fraudulent deeds for establishment or defeat of petition for organization of irrigation districts, see §

41-7-209

.

Whether transaction is mortgage. —

A transaction constituted a mortgage where: (1) the borrowers deeded their property to the lender, (2) there was a great disparity between the value of the property and the sale price, and (3) the parties contemporaneously entered into an installment contract for the reconveyance of the property back to the borrowers upon payment of the amount borrowed. Sannerud v. Brantz, 928 P.2d 477,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1996).

City acquires no mineral interest through common-law dedication of streets to “public use.” —

A city's interest under an 1870 common-law dedication of streets and alleys was sufficient to accommodate the use of the property by the public for street and related purposes, such as laying of gas and water lines and building sewers, but the city acquired no interest in the minerals underlying the streets, despite the dedicatory language “to the public use.” City of Evanston v. Robinson, 702 P.2d 1283,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 506

(Wyo. 1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

23 Am. Jur. 2d Deeds § 1 et seq.; 54 Am. Jur. 2d Mortgages § 1 et seq.

Inability to obtain license, permit, or charter required for tenant's business as defense to enforcement of lease, 89 ALR3d 329.

Conveyance of “right of way,” in connection with conveyance of another tract, as passing fee or easement, 89 ALR3d 767.

Validity, construction and application of provisions entitling mortgagee to increase interest rate on transfer of mortgaged property, 92 ALR3d 822.

Lease provisions allowing termination or forfeiture for violation of law, 92 ALR3d 967.

Recovery of expected profits lost by lessor's breach of lease preventing or delaying operation of new business, 92 ALR3d 1286.

Application of usury laws to transaction characterized as “leases,” 94 ALR3d 640.

Which of conflicting descriptions in deeds or mortgages of fractional quantity of interest intended to be conveyed prevails, 12 ALR4th 795.

When lessor may withhold consent under unqualified provision in lease prohibiting assignment or subletting of leased premises without lessor's consent, 21 ALR4th 188.

What transfers justify acceleration under “due-on-sale” clause of real-estate mortgage, 22 ALR4th 1266.

Construction and effect of options to purchase at specified price and at price offered by third person, included in same instrument, 22 ALR4th 1293.

Right to exercise option to renew or extend lease as affected by tenant's breach of other covenants or conditions, 23 ALR4th 908.

Vendor and purchaser: recovery for increased mortgage interest costs where vendor fails or refuses to convey, 28 ALR4th 1078.

Necessity and reasonableness of vendor's notice to vendee of requisite time of performance of real-estate sales contract after prior waiver or extension of original time of performance, 32 ALR4th 8.

Validity and construction of restrictive covenant prohibiting or governing outside storage or parking of house trailers, motor homes, campers, vans, and the like, in residential neighborhoods, 32 ALR4th 651.

Production on one tract as extending term on other tract where one mineral lease conveys oil or gas rights in separate tracts for as long as oil or gas is produced, 35 ALR4th 1167.

Validity and effect of “wraparound” mortgages whereby purchaser incorporates into agreed payments to grantor latter's obligation on initial mortgage, 36 ALR4th 144.

Merger or consolidation of corporate lessee as breach of clause in lease prohibiting, conditioning or restricting assignment or sublease, 39 ALR4th 879.

Duty of mortgagee of real property with respect to obtaining or maintenance of fire or other casualty insurance protecting mortgagor, 42 ALR4th 188.

Death of lessee as terminating lease, 42 ALR4th 963.

Express or implied restriction on lessee's use of residential property for business purposes, 46 ALR4th 496.

Radio or television aerials, antennas, towers or satellite dishes or discs as within terms of covenant restricting use, erection or maintenance of such structures upon residential property, 76 ALR4th 498.

Implied warranty of fitness or suitability in commercial leases—modern status, 76 ALR4th 928.

State civil rights legislation prohibiting sex discrimination in housing, 81 ALR4th 205.

Validity and construction of provision of mortgage or other real-estate financing contract prohibiting prepayment for a fixed period of time, 81 ALR4th 423.

Retaliatory eviction of tenant for reporting landlord's violation of law, 23 ALR5th 140.

Discharge of mortgage and taking back of new mortgage as affecting lien intervening between old and new mortgages, 43 ALR5th 519.

Admiralty jurisdiction of federal district courts under provisions of Ship Mortgage Act (46 USC § 954) authorizing in personam admiralty suits on default of ship mortgages, 72 ALR Fed 578.

When is eviction of tenant by private landlord conducted “under color of state law” for purposes of 42 USC § 1983, 73 ALR Fed 78.

Right of mortgagee and/or lienor to compensation when property subject to mortgage and/or lien is taken by federal governmental forfeiture based on criminal acts of owner, 136 ALR Fed 593.

26A C.J.S. Deeds § 1 et seq.; 59 C.J.S. Mortgages § 1 et seq.

§ 34-2-101.
Word “heirs” or other words of inheritance not necessary to convey fee simple; presumptions.

The term “heirs”, or other words of inheritance, shall not be necessary to create or convey an estate in fee simple, and every conveyance of real estate shall pass all the estate of the grantor therein, unless the intent to pass a less estate shall expressly appear or be necessarily implied in the terms of the grant.

History.

Laws 1884, ch. 5, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 34; R.S. 1899, § 2737; C.S. 1910, § 3629; C.S. 1920, § 4585; R.S. 1931, § 97-110; C.S. 1945, § 66-127; W.S. 1957, § 34-41.

Cross references. —

As to a provision that the acknowledgment and recording of plats in connection with laying out townsites shall be equivalent to a deed in fee simple, etc., see §

34-12-104

.

Right of way.—

Given the definition of right of way in 1910, it would have been unusual for someone in 1913 to believe the grant of a right of way meant a fee-simple conveyance, and instead, the drafter would have considered a conveyance of a right of way to grant only an easement; construing the deeds against the drafter and giving right of way its plain meaning as understood in 1913, the deeds at issue conveyed only a limited grant and indicated that the grantor conveyed a right of way, which meant an easement in 1913. Burlington Northern Santa Fe Ry. v. Box Creek Mineral Ltd. P'ship, 2018 WY 67, 420 P.3d 161,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 2018).

This section applies to a reservation of an easement

for a private way which is equivalent to a conveyance thereof. Forde v. Libby, 22 Wyo. 464, 143 P. 1190,

1914 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1914).

Applicability of rule in Shelley's Case. —

See Crawford v. Barber, 385 P.2d 655,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1963).

Where no automatic expiration, no fee simple determinable. —

The plain language in a deed, stating that the grantors conveyed the land for the purpose of constructing a county hospital, did not clearly state that the estate conveyed would expire automatically if the land was not used for the stated purpose. As such, it did not evidence an intent of the grantors to convey a fee simple determinable. Wood v. Board of County Comm'rs, 759 P.2d 1250,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. 1988).

Where no power to reenter, no condition subsequent. —

The plain language of a deed, while articulating that the land conveyed was to be used for a county hospital, did not clearly state an intent of the grantors to retain a discretionary power to reenter the land if the land ceased to be used for the stated purpose. Therefore, the grantors did not convey a fee simple subject to a condition subsequent. Wood v. Board of County Comm'rs, 759 P.2d 1250,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. 1988).

Creation of easement.

Deed from
the original owners' widows did not create an easement appurtenant
to the lands west of the railroad right-of-way; under
Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

34-2-101

, it was a fee simple conveyance, and the widows passed
the entire estate in fee simple as their intent to pass a lesser intent
did not expressly appear in the deed, nor was it implied.
Thornock v. Esterholdt, 2013 WY 42, 299 P.3d 68,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 2013).

Applied

in

McGinnis v. McGinnis, 391 P.2d 927,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 1964).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Fee Royalty Conveyancing in Wyoming,” II Land & Water L. Rev. 117 (1967).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Nature of estates or interests created by grant or devise to one and heirs if donee should have any heirs, 16 ALR2d 670.

Postponing or limiting the rights of grantee until after death of grantor as affecting validity of instrument in form of deed, 31 ALR2d 532.

Description in antecedent contract of land to be conveyed as merged in, or superseded by, deed, 38 ALR2d 1310.

Character of tenancy created by instrument purporting to convey one's own title or interest to himself and another, 44 ALR2d 595.

Character of tenancy created by owner's conveyance to himself and another, or to another alone, of an undivided interest, 44 ALR2d 595.

Delivery as essential to gift by deed, 48 ALR2d 1405.

Conflict between granting and habendum clauses as to estate conveyed, 58 ALR2d 1374.

Delivery of a deed without manual transfer or record, 87 ALR2d 787.

Necessity of parting with control in case of delivery of deed without manual transfer or record, 87 ALR2d 787.

Estate created by deed to one and “blood heirs” or “blooded heirs,” 89 ALR2d 1222.

§ 34-2-102.
Form of warranty deed.

Conveyances of land may be substantially in the following form:

Warranty Deed. A. B., grantor, (here insert name or names and place of residence), for and in consideration of (here insert consideration) in hand paid, conveys and warrants to C. D., grantee, (here insert grantee's name or names and place of residence) the following described real estate (here insert description) situate in the county of , state of Wyoming. Dated this day of A.D.
A.B.

Click to view

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 93, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 2766; C.S. 1910, § 3658; C.S. 1920, § 4615; R.S. 1931, § 97-201; C.S. 1945, § 66-201; W.S. 1957, § 34-42.

Cross references. —

As to information to be shown in deed, and as to form of deed with reference to real property sold under mortgage or execution, see §

1-18-109

et seq.

As to required words for waiver of homestead exemptions, see §

34-2-121

.

Covenants. —

Where two brother agreed to partition their ranch and agreed that, if a railway right-of-way traversing their ranch was ever abandoned, they would execute any necessary documents to vest the other with full title in the right-of-way over his respective portion, where years later, one brother purchased the right-of-way but his successors (defendants) refused to execute documents to fully vest the second brother's successors (plaintiffs) with title to the right of way over their portion, and where plaintiffs filed suit seeking specific performance, the district court erred in entering summary judgment for defendants because the unambiguous contractual language required defendants, as the first brother's successors, to convey whatever interest they received in the right of way over the second brother's land to plaintiffs, the second brother's successors. The brothers'
agreement reflected in the warranty deeds unambiguously reflected an intent to cross-convey all of the interest the brothers owned in the land within the right-of-way to the brother who received the adjacent property as part of the partition and cross-conveyance of the entire ranch.
Davidson Land Co., LLC v. Davidson, 2011 WY 29, 247 P.3d 67,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 2011).

Quoted

in

Bakken v. Price, 613 P.2d 1222,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 286

(Wyo. 1980).

Cited

in

United States v. Northern Pac. Ry., 169 F. Supp. 735, 1959 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 3874 (D. Wyo. 1959).

§ 34-2-103.
Form of warranty deed; effect; implied covenants.

Every deed in substance in the above form [§

34-2-102

], when otherwise duly executed, shall be deemed and held a conveyance in fee simple, to the grantee, his heirs and assigns, with covenants on the part of the grantor, (a) that at the time of the making and delivery of such deed he was lawfully seized of an indefeasible estate in fee simple in and to the premises therein described, and had good right and power to convey the same; (b) that the same were then free from all incumbrances; and (c) that he warrants to the grantee, his heirs and assigns, the quiet and peaceful possession of such premises, and will defend the title thereto against all persons who may lawfully claim the same. And such covenants shall be obligatory upon the grantor, his heirs and personal representatives, as fully, and with like effect as if written at length in such deed.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 93, § 1, 2nd par.; R.S. 1899, § 2767; C.S. 1910, § 3659; C.S. 1920, § 4616; R.S. 1931, § 97-202; C.S. 1945, § 66-202; W.S. 1957, § 34-43.

Cross references. —

See also §§

34-1-135

,

34-1-136

, as to implied covenants.

Mortgage lien an encumbrance. —

Mortgage lien constituted an encumbrance on property, and purchasers were entitled to seek redress from sellers for breach of implied covenants in warranty deed, since purchasers suffered a constructive eviction when they rightfully yielded to mortgagee's paramount title. Patel v. Khan, 970 P.2d 836,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 176

(Wyo. 1998).

Breach of warranty action prohibited. —

Where the grantee is a co-tenant and thus the owner of the outstanding interest, that interest must be subtracted from the interest purportedly warranted by the grantor; a grantee may not bring an action for breach of warranty where he owns the outstanding interest that the grantor is alleged to have warranted. Gilstrap v. June Eisele Warren Trust, 2005 WY 21, 106 P.3d 858,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 2005).

Common grazing rights rendered summary judgment inappropriate. —

Grant of summary judgment in favor of the sellers of a ranch in the buyer's action for breach of contract and breach of warranty deed was improper because the sales contract and the warranty deed stated that the property was to be free from all encumbrances, but there were common grazing rights enforceable against the buyer, Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 34-2-103(b). Along with other material facts, the extent to which those rights encumbered the property was a question of material fact that had yet to be determined.
Foxley & Co. v. Ellis, 2009 WY 16, 201 P.3d 425,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 2009).

Quoted

in

Bakken v. Price, 613 P.2d 1222,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 286

(Wyo. 1980); Gheen v. State ex rel. Dep't of Health, 2014 WY 70,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(May 30, 2014).

Cited

in

United States v. Northern Pac. Ry., 169 F. Supp. 735, 1959 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 3874 (D. Wyo. 1959).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Measure and elements of damages recoverable from vendor where there has been mistake as to amount of land conveyed, 94 ALR3d 1091.

§ 34-2-104.
Form of quitclaim deed.

Quitclaim may be in substance in the following form:

Quitclaim Deed. A. B., grantor (here insert grantor's name or names, and place of residence) for the consideration of (here insert consideration) conveys and quitclaims to (here insert grantee's name or names) all interest in the following described real estate, (here insert description) situate in the county of , in the state of Wyoming. Dated this day of A.D.
A.B.

Click to view

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 93, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 2768; C.S. 1910, § 3660; C.S. 1920, § 4617; R.S. 1931, § 97-203; C.S. 1945, § 66-203; W.S. 1957, § 34-44.

Cross references. —

As to quitclaim deeds generally, see §

34-1-107

.

As to required words for waiver of homestead exemptions, see §

34-2-121

.

“Grant, bargain, sell” not quitclaim. —

Deed executed by entryman who had filed application for oil and gas prospecting permit, conveying undivided interest in oil and gas and other minerals, containing words “grant, bargain, sell,” is a deed of bargain and sale, not conveying merely grantor's interest in property, but the property itself, and is not a “quitclaim deed.” Tendolle v. Eureka Oil Syndicate, 38 Wyo. 442, 268 P. 185,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 38 Wyo. 442, 270 P. 542,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 1928); Walliker v. Escott, 608 P.2d 1272,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 250

(Wyo. 1980).

Perfecting of grantor's legal title and grantee's interest. —

When a grantor who does not possess legal title quitclaims his entire interest in a piece of real property, the grantee cannot then expect that such a grant carries with it the implication that grantor has retained an equitable interest capable of ripening into legal title from which the grantee will then be permitted to claim; but when an entryman quitclaims a portion of a mineral estate, while retaining an equitable interest in the surface estate, it is then logical for the grantee to expect that the grantor will later perfect legal title and thus perfect the grantee's mineral interest. Walliker v. Escott, 608 P.2d 1272,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 250

(Wyo. 1980).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Estoppel by Deed, Partial Quitclaims, Walliker v. Escott, 608 P.2d 1272,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 250

(Wyo. 1980),” see XVI Land & Water L. Rev. 269 (1981).

§ 34-2-105.
Form of quitclaim deed; effect generally.

Every deed in substance in the form prescribed in the foregoing section [§

34-2-104

], when otherwise duly executed, shall be deemed and held a sufficient conveyance, release and quitclaim to the grantee, his heirs and assigns, in fee of all the then existing legal or equitable rights of the grantor in the premises therein described, but shall not extend to after acquired title unless words are added expressing such intention.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 93, § 2, 2nd par.; R.S. 1899, § 2769; C.S. 1910, § 3661; C.S. 1920, § 4618; R.S. 1931, § 97-204; C.S. 1945, § 66-204; W.S. 1957, § 34-45.

Cross references. —

For another provision concerning effect of quitclaim deeds, see §

34-1-107

.

As to execution of quitclaim deed in connection with sale of lands and improvements known as and included in Saratoga Hot Springs reserve, see §

36-8-404

.

History of section. —

This section is a part of § 2 of ch. 93, Laws 1895, but was set out as a separate section by prior compilers.

Because of the compilation of the statute as separate sections, the words “the foregoing” were substituted for the original word “this” in the first sentence.

Perfecting of grantor's legal title and grantee's interest. —

When a grantor who does not possess legal title quitclaims his entire interest in a piece of real property, the grantee cannot then expect that such a grant carries with it the implication that grantor has retained an equitable interest capable of ripening into legal title from which the grantee will then be permitted to claim; but when an entryman quitclaims a portion of a mineral estate, while retaining an equitable interest in the surface estate, it is then logical for the grantee to expect that the grantor will later perfect legal title and thus perfect the grantee's mineral interest. Walliker v. Escott, 608 P.2d 1272,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 250

(Wyo. 1980).

Valid transfer of royalty interests. —

That royalty interests in oil and gas permit were transferred when permit had expired and before renewal was granted did not invalidate transfer. Rue v. Merrill, 42 Wyo. 511, 297 P. 379,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 1931).

Quoted

in

Davidson Land Co., Llc v. Davidson, 2011 WY 29, 247 P.3d 67,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Feb. 18, 2011); Gheen v. State ex rel. Dep't of Health, 2014 WY 70,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(May 30, 2014).

Cited

in

Tendolle v. Eureka Oil Syndicate, 38 Wyo. 442, 268 P. 185,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(1928).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Estoppel by Deed, Partial Quitclaims, Walliker v. Escott, 608 P.2d 1272,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 250

(Wyo. 1980),” see XVI Land & Water L. Rev. 269 (1981).

§ 34-2-106.
Form of quitclaim deed; effect without word “release”.

A deed of quitclaim, without the use of the word “release” shall be sufficient to pass all the estate which the grantor could lawfully convey by deed of bargain and sale. And all deeds of quitclaim, heretofore given to real estate in this state, shall have the same effect as deeds of quitclaim and release and shall operate the same as if the word “release” had been used therein.

History.

Laws 1884, ch. 5, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 35; R.S. 1899, § 2771; C.S. 1910, § 3663; C.S. 1920, § 4620; R.S. 1931, § 97-206; C.S. 1945, § 66-218; W.S. 1957, § 34-46.

§ 34-2-107.
Form of real estate mortgage.

Mortgages of land may be in the following form:

A. B., mortgagor, (here insert the name or names and place of residence) to secure the payment of (here insert the amount of indebtedness, when due, rate of interest, and whether secured by a note or otherwise), do hereby mortgage the following described real estate (here insert description thereof) situate in county, state of Wyoming. The mortgagor agrees to pay all taxes and assessments on said premises and to keep the buildings thereon insured in a sum not less than $ during the life of this mortgage, payable to the mortgagee; and in case he does not the mortgagee may insure said building or buildings and pay said taxes and all amounts so paid shall be added to and considered as part of the above indebtedness hereby secured. In case of default of payment of either interest or principal then the whole indebtedness herein secured shall become due and payable, and the mortgagee may proceed, pursuant to law, to foreclose on said property and in case of foreclosure the mortgagor hereby agrees to pay all costs of the same, including an attorney's fee of $ Dated this day of A.D.
A.B.

Click to view

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 93, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 2774; C.S. 1910, § 3666; C.S. 1920, § 4623; R.S. 1931, § 71-201; C.S. 1945, § 66-205; W.S. 1957, § 34-46.

Cross references. —

As to master form mortgages generally, see §§

34-2-109

to

34-2-112

.

As to required words for waiver of homestead exemptions, see §

34-2-121

.

As to form of deeds of trust, see §

34-3-101

.

Mortgage superior to general lien and homestead right. —

A mortgage executed by a grantee to a third person as security for money loaned for paying the purchase price of a homestead, as well as a purchase money mortgage executed to the grantor, has, in equity, precedence over any prior general lien, and is superior to the homestead right of the mortgagor, without any statutory provision therefor, and it is immaterial that the wife or husband of the grantee did not join in the execution of the mortgage or that the right of homestead is not expressly waived or released by a recital to that effect in the mortgage or in the certificate of acknowledgment. Powers v. Pense, 20 Wyo. 327, 123 P. 925,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1912).

And rights of first mortgagee not affected by accepting third mortgage. —

Acceptance by first mortgagee of a third mortgage including the amount due on the first mortgage did not, in absence of agreement to the contrary, discharge the lien of first mortgage, and first mortgagee continued to hold first and third liens on the property, unaffected by decree foreclosing the second mortgage in an action to which he was not a party. Bolln v. La Prele Live Stock Co., 27 Wyo. 335, 196 P. 748,

1921 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1921).

Mortgage upheld when mistake made in attestation. —

Where by mistake there was but one attesting witness to a mortgage, instead of two, as required by law, and mortgage provided that on default mortgagee could take possession and sell “at public auction in manner provided by law,” there being no provision in the territorial statutes for “manner” of sale, equity would relieve the mortgagee. Jubb v. Thorpe, 1 Wyo. 356,

1877 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1877).

Or legal consideration separable from illegal. —

When consideration of a mortgage consists of several transactions, some legal and some not, and they may be separated, the mortgage may be upheld for the legal consideration. Conradt v. Lepper, 13 Wyo. 473, 81 P. 307,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 13 Wyo. 473, 81 P. 307,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1905).

Or description of land by abbreviations. —

Mortgage description, describing land entirely by abbreviations, instead of words, to designate the portions of sections, and failing to state whether township was north or south is sufficient under evidence showing that all land in the named township in the named county was in such township north. Robinson Mercantile Co. v. Davis, 26 Wyo. 484, 187 P. 931,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1920), limited, Tendolle v. Eureka Oil Syndicate, 38 Wyo. 442, 268 P. 185,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1928).

Required clause for conveyance or release of homestead interest. —

Since enactment of ch. 93, Laws 1895, to make valid conveyance of homestead or to release homestead interest, it has been necessary that body of instrument and certificate of acknowledgment contain clause expressly releasing or waiving homestead right. Jones v. Losekamp, 19 Wyo. 83, 114 P. 673,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1911).

Agreement to give mortgage for amount advanced

for completion of purchase price of land does not require lender to advance the entire sum needed in order to be entitled to a mortgage. Walter v. Kressman, 25 Wyo. 292, 169 P. 3,

1917 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1917).

Attorney's fees. —

Attorney's fees are chargeable under this chapter where 1 of the mortgagors has died and the claim was not presented against his estate. Delfelder v. Teton Land & Inv. Co., 46 Wyo. 142, 24 P.2d 702,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 46 Wyo. 142, 26 P.2d 153,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1933).

Foreclosure notice not fraudulent. —

Where a mortgage foreclosure notice stated $3,500 was due as attorney's fees and only $1,250 was actually paid, it was held not fraudulent. Delfelder v. Teton Land & Inv. Co., 46 Wyo. 142, 24 P.2d 702,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 46 Wyo. 142, 26 P.2d 153,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1933).

Mortgage clause in insurance policy. —

Insurance policy's mortgage clause, requiring mortgagee to pay premiums if mortgagor fails, was condition and not covenant on which suit could be maintained. Farnsworth v. Riverton Wyo. Ref. Co., 35 Wyo. 334, 249 P. 555,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1926).

§ 34-2-108.
Form of real estate mortgage; effect; when covenants implied.

Every such mortgage when otherwise duly executed, shall be deemed and held a good and sufficient mortgage in fee to secure the payment of the moneys therein specified; and if the same contains the words “and warrants”, the same shall be construed the same as if full covenants of seizin, good right to convey against encumbrances, of quiet enjoyment and general warranty, as expressed in section one of this act [§§

34-2-102

,

34-2-103

] were fully written therein; but if the words “and warrants” are omitted no such covenant shall be implied.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 93, § 3, 2nd par.; R.S. 1899, § 2775; C.S. 1910, § 3667; C.S. 1920, § 4624; R.S. 1931, § 71-202; C.S. 1945, § 66-206; W.S. 1957, § 34-48.

Cross references. —

As to covenants generally, see §§

34-1-135

,

34-1-136

.

Mortgage may be executed to copartnership. —

Mortgage executed to a copartnership is valid as against objection that it was not executed to a person or a corporation, since a mortgage merely creates a lien upon the land and does not pass title thereto. Robinson Mercantile Co. v. Davis, 26 Wyo. 484, 187 P. 931,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1920), limited, Tendolle v. Eureka Oil Syndicate, 38 Wyo. 442, 268 P. 185,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1928).

Acknowledgment. —

Acknowledgment is not necessary to create equitable mortgage. Harney v. Montgomery, 29 Wyo. 362, 213 P. 378,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1923).

§ 34-2-109.
Master form mortgage; recording authorized; entitlement on face; need not be acknowledged.

An instrument containing a form or forms of covenants, conditions, obligations, powers, and other clauses of a mortgage may be recorded in the office of the county clerk, upon the request of any person, on tender of the lawful fees therefor, shall record the same in his registry. Every such instrument shall be entitled on the face thereof as a “Master form recorded by
. . . . . (name of person causing the instrument to be recorded)”. Such instrument need not be acknowledged to be entitled to record.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 226, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 34-48.1; Laws 2009, ch. 168, § 206.

Cross references. —

As to mortgages and deeds of trust generally, see §

34-2-107

et seq. and chapter 3 of this title, respectively.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “office of the county clerk” for “registry of deeds of any county and the recorder of such county.”

§ 34-2-110.
Master form mortgage; index.

When any such instrument is recorded, the recorder shall index such instrument under the name of the person causing it to be recorded in the manner provided for miscellaneous instruments relating to real estate.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 226, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 34-48.2.

§ 34-2-111.
Master form mortgage; use by reference.

Thereafter any of the provisions of such master form instrument may be incorporated by reference in any mortgage of real estate situated within this state, if such reference in the mortgage states that the master form instrument was recorded in the county in which the mortgage is offered for record, the date when and the book and page or pages where such master form instrument was recorded, and that a copy of such master form instrument was furnished to the person executing the mortgage. The recording of any mortgage which has so incorporated by reference therein any of the provisions of a master form instrument recorded as provided in this section shall have like effect as if such provisions of the master form so incorporated by reference had been set forth fully in the mortgage.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 226, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 34-48.3.

§ 34-2-112.
Master form mortgage; matters not recorded.

Whenever a mortgage is presented for recording on which is set forth matter purporting to be a copy or reproduction of such master form instrument or of part thereof, identified by its title as provided in W.S.

34-2-109

and stating the date when it was recorded and the book and page where it was recorded, preceded by the words “do not record” or “not to be recorded”, and on a separate page from the matter to be recorded as a part of the mortgage in such manner that it will not appear upon a photographic reproduction of any page containing any part of the mortgage, such matter shall not be recorded by the recorder to whom the instrument is presented for recording; in such case the recorder shall record only the mortgage apart from such matter and shall not be liable for so doing, any other provisions of law to the contrary notwithstanding.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 226, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 34-48.4.

Dates. —

Because the “Deed of Trust Contract” failed to state the date of the trust instrument, it did not create a valid trust under Wyoming law.
2010 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 141819.

§ 34-2-113.
Cancellation form for mortgage or deed of trust; recordation; effect.

A cancellation or discharge of mortgage or deed of trust may be in the following form substantially:

Certificate of Discharge This certifies that a (mortgage or deed of trust, as the case may be) from to dated A.D. and recorded in book of on page has been fully satisfied by the payment of the debt secured thereby, and is hereby cancelled and discharged. Signed in the presence of county clerk of County. Filed and recorded A.D. at M. County clerk

Click to view

Such cancellation or discharge shall be entered in a book kept for that purpose, and signed by the mortgagee or trustee, his attorney-in-fact, executor, administrator or assigns, in the presence of the county clerk or his deputy who shall subscribe the same as a witness, and such cancellation or discharge shall have the same effect as a deed or release duly acknowledged and recorded.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 93, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 2777; C.S. 1910, § 3669; C.S. 1920, § 4626; R.S. 1931, § 71-204; C.S. 1945, § 66-208; W.S. 1957, § 34-49.

Quitclaim deed not release of mortgage. —

Quitclaim deed from mortgagee to assignee of mortgagor will not operate as release of mortgage if not so intended. Chesney v. Valley Live Stock Co., 34 Wyo. 378, 244 P. 216,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1926).

Failure to enter cancellation. —

Because a debtor's note was set-off against her obligation to a limited liability company (LLC) as allowed by
Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-15-417

, the note was satisfied and a mortgage terminated at the time the LLC answered a creditor's writ of garnishment. As the debtor did not file her petition until after that date, the mortgage was not property of the estate, regardless of the fact that the LLC did not file a cancellation form or discharge as required under
Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

34-2-113

and

34-1-130

, and thus, the creditor did not violate the automatic stay by seeking to foreclose on the LLC's property.
In re Ford, 2013 Bankr. LEXIS 179 (Bankr. D. Wyo. Jan. 16, 2013).

§ 34-2-114.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 20, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1965, ch. 72, §§ 1 through 5, Laws 1879, ch. 22, § 1, and Laws 1897, ch. 23, § 1, related to certificates of acknowledgement.

§ 34-2-115.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 20, § 3.

§ 34-2-116.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 20, § 3.

§ 34-2-117.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 20, § 3.

§ 34-2-118.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 20, § 3.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 6, ch. 72, Laws 1965, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict with that act.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1965, ch. 72, § 7 makes the act effective on January 1, 1966.

§ 34-2-119.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 20, § 3.

Cross references. —

For other provisions as to who may take acknowledgments and as to manner of taking, see §§

34-1-113

to 34-1-115.

§ 34-2-120.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 20, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to officers authorized to administer oaths generally, see §

1-2-102

.